Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2854.01
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Insurance shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding the administration of the Nebraska Hospital-Medical Liability Act. Such rules and regulations shall relate to issuing notices of payment due and such other matters as may be necessary to promote the efficient operation of the act in accordance with its terms.

Laws 1984, LB 692, § 19.